Washington statutes.
RCW 41.48.050

Extension of social security benefits to employees of political subdivisions—Termination, procedure.

(1) Each political subdivision of the state is hereby authorized to submit for approval by the governor a plan for extending the benefits of title II of the social security act, in conformity with the applicable provisions of such act, to those employees of such political subdivisions who are not covered by an existing pension or retirement system. Each pension or retirement system established by the state or a political subdivision thereof is hereby authorized to submit for approval by the governor a plan for extending the benefits of title II of the social security act, in conformity with applicable provisions of such act, to members of such pension or retirement system. Each such plan and any amendment thereof shall be approved by the governor if he or she finds that such plan, or such plan as amended, is in conformity with such requirements as are provided in regulations of the governor, except that no such plan shall be approved unless—

(a) It is in conformity with the requirements of the social security act and with the agreement entered into under RCW 41.48.030;

(b) It provides that all services which constitute employment as defined in RCW 41.48.020 and are performed in the employ of the political subdivision by employees thereof, shall be covered by the plan;

(c) It specifies the source or sources from which the funds necessary to make the payments required by paragraph (a) of subsection (3) and by subsection (4) of this section are expected to be derived and contains reasonable assurance that such sources will be adequate for such purposes;

(d) It provides that in the plan of coverage for members of the state teachers' retirement system or for state employee members of the state employees' retirement system, there shall be no additional cost to or involvement of the state until such plan has received prior approval by the legislature;

(e) It provides for such methods of administration of the plan by the political subdivision as are found by the governor to be necessary for the proper and efficient administration of the plan;

(f) It provides that the political subdivision will make such reports, in such form and containing such information, as the governor may from time to time require and comply with such provisions as the governor or the secretary of health, education, and welfare may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports; and

(g) It authorizes the governor to terminate the plan in its entirety, in his or her discretion, if he or she finds that there has been a failure to comply substantially with any provision contained in such plan, such termination to take effect at the expiration of such notice and on such conditions as may be provided by regulations of the governor and may be consistent with the provisions of the social security act;

(h) It provides that law enforcement officers and firefighters of each political subdivision of this state who are covered by the Washington Law Enforcement Officers' and Firefighters' Retirement System Act (chapter 209, Laws of 1969 ex. sess.) as now in existence or hereafter amended shall constitute a separate "coverage group" for purposes of the plan or agreement entered into under this section and for purposes of section 216 of the social security act. To the extent that the plan or agreement entered into between the state and any political subdivision of this state is inconsistent with this subsection, the governor shall seek to modify the inconsistency;

(i) It provides that the plan or agreement may be terminated by any political subdivision as to any such coverage group upon giving at least two years advance notice in writing to the governor, effective at the end of the calendar quarter specified in the notice. It shall specify that before notice of such termination is given, a referendum shall be held among the members of the coverage group under the following conditions:

(i) The referendum shall be conducted under the supervision of the legislative body of the political subdivision.

(ii) Not less than sixty days' notice of such referendum shall be given to members of the coverage group.

(iii) An opportunity to vote by secret ballot in such referendum shall be given and shall be limited to all members of the coverage group.

(iv) The proposal for termination shall be approved only if a majority of the coverage group vote in favor of termination.

(v) If a majority of the coverage group vote in favor of termination, the legislative body of the political subdivision shall certify the results of the referendum to the governor and give notice of termination of such coverage group.

(2) The governor shall not finally refuse to approve a plan submitted by a political subdivision under subsection (1) [of this section], and shall not terminate an approved plan, without reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing to the political subdivision affected thereby.

(3)(a) Each political subdivision as to which a plan has been approved under this section shall pay into the contribution account, with respect to wages (as defined in RCW 41.48.020), at such time or times as the governor may by regulation prescribe, contributions in the amounts and at the rates specified in the applicable agreement entered into by the governor under RCW 41.48.030.

(b) Each political subdivision required to make payments under paragraph (a) of this subsection is authorized, in consideration of the employee's retention in, or entry upon, employment after enactment of this chapter, to impose upon each of its employees, as to services which are covered by an approved plan, a contribution with respect to his or her wages (as defined in RCW 41.48.020), not exceeding the amount of employee tax which is imposed by the federal insurance contributions act, and to deduct the amount of such contribution from his or her wages as and when paid. Contributions so collected shall be paid into the OASI contribution account in partial discharge of the liability of such political subdivision or instrumentality under paragraph (a) of this subsection. Failure to deduct such contribution shall not relieve the employee or employer of liability therefor.

(4) Delinquent reports and payments due under paragraph (f) of subsection (1) and paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section will be subject to an added interest charge of six percent per year or, if higher, the rate chargeable to the state by the secretary by virtue of federal law, if the late report or payment contributes to any federal penalty for late filing of reports or for late deposit of contributions. Delinquent contributions, interest, and penalties may be recovered by civil action or may, at the request of the governor, be deducted from any other moneys payable to the political subdivision by any department or agency of the state.

[ 2012 c 117 s 79; 1981 c 119 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 20; 1955 ex.s. c 4 s 5; 1951 c 184 s 5.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Severability—1971 ex.s. c 257: See notes following RCW 41.26.030.

Law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system: Chapter 41.26 RCW.

Public employees' retirement system: Chapter 41.40 RCW.

Teachers' retirement system: Chapter 41.32 RCW.